Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0409

Waiver of members meeting notice.

(1) A member may waive notice of a members meeting before, during, or after the meeting.

(2) A member's participation in a members meeting is a waiver of notice of that meeting unless the member objects to the meeting at the beginning of the meeting or promptly upon the member's arrival at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.

[ 2019 c 37 s 409.]